Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.160

Violation of injunction—Contempt of court—Civil penalty.

A person or business that violates an injunction issued under this chapter may be found in contempt of court under RCW 7.21.010. Upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that the person or business is in contempt, the court may order any remedial sanction as authorized by RCW 7.21.030. Further, the court may, in addition to the remedial sanctions available under RCW 7.21.030, order the person or business to pay a civil penalty to the state in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars, which shall be deposited in the related program account. For the purposes of this section, the superior court issuing any injunction retains jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties.

[ 2002 c 86 s 117.]